usr/share/hunspell/mr_IN.dic
अंतरणे/NPR
अटकणे/NPR
अडकणे/MNPQ
अडणे/MNPQ
अपेक्षणे/NOP
अभ्यासणे/NOP
अवरोधणे/NP
अवलंबणे/MNOPQ
आंबणे/MNPQ
आंबुसणे/P
आकळणे/NP
आखडणे/NP
आचंबणे/NP
आटणे/MNPQ
आटवणे/NOP
आठवणे/NOP
आदळणे/NP
आनंदणे/NOP
आरणे/MNPQ
आरूढणे/NP
आर्जवणे/NP
आळसणे/NPR
आवर्तणे/NP
आश्वासणे/NP
उकडणे/NP
उकळणे/MNPQ
उखडणे/MNPQ
उगाळणे/NP
उचकटणे/NP
उचकणे/MNPQ
उजळणे/MNPQ
उडणे/MNPQ
उतरणे/MNPQ
उद्धारणे/NP
उनाडणे/MNPQ
उपजणे/NP
उपद्रवणे/NP
उफाळणे/NP
उबारणे/NP
उमटणे/MNPQ
उमलणे/MNPQ
उरकणे/MNPQ
उलगडणे/MNPQ
उलथणे/MNPQ
उसकटणे/MNPQ
उसकणे/NPQ
उसपणे/NP
ओकणे/NP
ओढणे/MNPQ
ओरबाडणे/NP
ओलावणे/NP
ओसरणे/NP
कंठणे/NP
कडाडणे/NP
कण्हणे/NP
करणे/NOPQ
करपणे/MNPQ
करवडणे/NP
कलंडणे/MNPQ
कळणे/MNPQ
कळवणे/NP
कांक्षणे/NP
कांडणे/MNPQ
काकडणे/NP
कातरणे/MNPQ
कापणे/MNPQ
काळवंडणे/NP
किंकाळणे/MNPQ
किटणे/MPQ
किरकिरणे/NP
किसणे/MPQ
कुंथणे/MNPQ
कुचकुचणे/P
कुजणे/PQ
कुरतडणे/MNPQ
कुरवाळणे/NP
केकाटणे/MNPQ
कोंडणे/NPR
कोंदटणे/NP
कोकलणे/MNPQ
कोलणे/MNPQ
कोलमडणे/NP
कोसळणे/NP
क्षेपणे/NP
खंडणे/NP
खडखडणे/MNPQ
खडबडणे/NP
खणकवणे/NP
खणणे/MNPQ
खदखदणे/NP
खरचटणे/NP
खलणे/NP
खवखवणे/NP
खाजणे/NP
खारणे/MNPQ
खालावणे/NP
खिजणे/MPQ
खुंटणे/MNPQ
खुडणे/P
खुणवणे/NP
खुलणे/PQ
खेचणे/MNPQ
खेळणे/MNPQ
खोकणे/MNPQ
खोदणे/MNPQ
खोळंबणे/MNPQ
गंडणे/MNPQ
गचकणे/NPR
गडबडणे/MNPQ
गणणे/NP
गमणे/MNPQR
गलगलणे/NP
गळणे/NP
गांजणे/NP
गाठणे/MNPQ
गिरगटणे/NP
गिरवणे/NOP
गुंगणे/MNPQ
गुणगुणणे/P
गुदमरणे/MNPQ
गुरकणे/NPR
गुरफटणे/MNPQ
गोंजारणे/NP
गोठणे/MNPQ
घटणे/MNPQ
घमघमणे/NP
घाटणे/NP
घालणे/MNPQ
घुरघुरणे/P
घुसमटणे/MNPQ
घेणे/NPU
घेरणे/NP
घोटाळणे/NP
घोळणे/MNPQ
चघळणे/NP
चटचटणे/NP
चढणे/MNPQ
चरकणे/NP
चरणे/NP
चाचपडणे/NP
चाचपणे/NP
चाटणे/MNPQ
चावणे/MNPQ
चिंतणे/NP
चित्कारणे/NP
चिथणे/MPQ
चिरकणे/NP
चुकचुकणे/P
चुळबुळणे/P
चेंगरणे/NP
चेष्टणे/MNPQR
चोखणे/MNPQ
चोळणे/MNPQ
चोळवटणे/NP
छमकणे/MNPQR
छिंदणे/NP
छिडकणे/NP
छेडणे/MNPQ
जडणे/MNPQR
जपणे/NP
जळणे/MNPQ
जाणणे/MNPQ
जाळणे/MNPQ
जिंकणे/MNPQ
जोजवणे/NP
जोडणे/MNPQ
झंकारणे/NP
झटणे/NP
झळकणे/MNPQR
झाकाळणे/NP
झिंगणे/NP
झिरपणे/MNPQ
झुंजणे/MNPQ
झुलणे/PMQ
झेपणे/NPRQ
झोडपणे/MNPQ
झोपणे/MNPQ
टरकणे/MNPQR
टरारणे/NP
टिकणे/MPQ
टेहळणे/NP
ठकणे/MNPQ
ठणकणे/NPR
ठसठसणे/NP
ठिबकणे/NP
ठेचणे/NP
ठोकणे/MNPQ
डगमगणे/NP
डबडबणे/NP
डसणे/MNPQ
डिकवणे/NP
डुंबणे/MNPQ
डुचमळणे/NP
डोलणे/MNPQR
ढणढणणे/NP
ढासळणे/MNPQ
ढेंढाळणे/NP
तटतटणे/NP
तडकणे/NPR
तरंगणे/MNPQ
तरकटणे/NP
तळतळणे/NPR
तळपणे/NP
ताठकळणे/MNPQ
ताणणे/MNPQ
तासणे/MNPQ
तुंबणे/MNPQ
तुटणे/P
तुष्टणे/NP
तोषणे/MNPQ
थंडावणे/NP
थबथबणे/NP
थरकावणे/NP
थापडणे/MNPQ
थिरकणे/NP
थोपणे/MNPQ
दगावणे/NP
दणकणे/NPR
दणाणणे/NP
दमटणे/NP
दर्शणे/MNPQ
दामटणे/MNPQ
दिपणे/PMQR
दुखणे/MNPQRe
दुभंगणे/NP
दृष्टावणे/NP
धकधकणे/NP
धजणे/NPR
धडकणे/MNPQ
धरणे/MNPQe
धिक्कारणे/NP
धुडकणे/MNPQR
नकलणे/NP
नटणे/MNPQ
नडणे/MNPQ
नांदणे/MNPQ
नावाजणे/NP
नावाणणे/NP
निभावणे/NP
निमंत्रणे/NP
निवणे/MPQ
निवळणे/NP
निसटणे/NP
पकडणे/MNPQ
पखरणे/NP
पटकणे/NPRMQ
पटकवणे/NPR
पटणे/MNPQ
परतणे/MNPQR
परिहरणे/NP
पळणे/MNPQ
पसरणे/MNPQ
पाजळणे/NP
पातणे/NP
पादणे/MNPQ
पाहणे/NOPQ
पिचकणे/NP
पिटणे/MPQ
पिळवटणे/NP
पुरणे/MPQ
पेलणे/MNPQ
पेहरणे/NP
पोचणे/MNPQ
प्रवेशणे/NP
प्रसवणे/NP
फटकणे/MNPQR
फडकणे/MNPQR
फरफटणे/MNPQ
फळणे/NP
फवारणे/NP
फितणे/MPQ
फिस्कटणे/NPMQ
फुगणे/PQ
फुलारणे/NP
फेकणे/NP
बघितणे/FNP
बतावणे/NP
बदलणे/MNPQ
बहकणे/NPR
बांधणे/MNPQ
बाटणे/MNPQ
बाळगणे/MNPQ
बिथरणे/MNPQ
बुचकळणे/NP
बुरसणे/NPR
बोचणे/MNPQ
बोलणे/MNPQRe
बोलावणे/NOPe
भंजाळणे/NP
भडकणे/MNPQR
भरभराटणे/NP
भलावणे/NP
भांडणे/MNPQ
भारणे/NPR
भिजणे/MPQ
भिरकणे/MNPQR
भिरभिरणे/NP
भुंकणे/MNPQ
भेलकंडणे/NP
भोगणे/MNPQ
भोवणे/NP
मटकणे/NPR
मरणे/MNPQ
मळणे/MNPQ
मांडणे/MNPQ
मागणे/MNPQe
मागसणे/NPR
मालवणे/NP
मावणे/MNPQ
मिंधणे/NP
मिचकणे/MNPQR
मिसळणे/MNPQ
मुतणे/PQ
मोडणे/MNPQ
येववणे/NP
रंजणे/MNPQ
रटरटणे/NP
रडणे/MNPQ
रांधणे/MNPQ
राखणे/MNPQ
रागणे/MNPQR
रिचणे/MPQ
रुळणे/MNPQ
रेखणे/NP
रोखणे/MNPQ
लगावणे/NP
लटकणे/MNPQR
लडबडणे/MNPQ
लागणे/NP
लाजणे/MNPQ
लावणे/MNOPQ
लुचणे/P
लेखणे/NP
लोंबकळणे/MNPQ
वखवखणे/NP
वटारणे/NP
वठणे/MNPQ
वर्षणे/NP
वसणे/MNPQ
वांच्छणे/NP
वाजणे/MNPQ
वाफणे/MNPQ
वाफाळणे/NP
विंचरणे/MNPQ
विझणे/MPQ
विरचणे/NP
विरोधणे/NP
विसकटणे/MNPQ
विस्कटणे/MNPQ
विस्फारणे/NP
व्यापणे/NP
शमणे/MNPQ
शिकणे/MPQ
शिणणे/MPQ
शिळवणे/NP
शेकणे/MNPQ
श्रवणे/NP
संगठणे/NP
संबोधणे/NP
संभाळणे/MNPQ
संरक्षणे/NP
सडणे/MNPQ
सतवणे/NP
समजणे/MNPQR
सरकणे/MNPQR
सरपटणे/MNPQ
सळसळणे/NP
सांगणे/MNPQ
साठणे/MNPQ
सामावणे/NP
सुखणे/NPR
सुटणे/P
सुलटणे/MNPQ
सुस्तावणे/NP
सोलवटणे/NP
स्फुंदणे/NP
हगणे/MNPQ
हटणे/MNPQ
हरखणे/NP
हळहळणे/NP
हाकलणे/MNPQ
हातळणे/MNPQ
हादडणे/MNPQ
हिंसणे/NP
हिसकणे/NPR
हुंकारणे/MNPQ
हुलकावणे/NP
हुसकणे/NPR
हेलकावणे/NP
